Florida, session 2026, SB344.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âSection 490.016, Florida Statutes, is created to 14 read: 15 490.016âUse of artificial intelligence.â 16 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âartificial 17 intelligenceâ means any machine-based system that varies in 18 level of autonomy and that, for any explicit or implicit 19 objective, infers from the inputs the system receives how to 20 generate outputs, including, but not limited to, content, 21 decisions, predictions, or recommendations that can influence 22 physical or virtual environments. 23 (2)âExcept as otherwise provided in this section, a 24 licensee may not use artificial intelligence in the practice of 25 psychology or school psychology. A licensee may use artificial 26 intelligence to: 27 (a)âAssist in administrative or supplementary support 28 services. Administrative and supplementary support services 29 include, but are not limited to, all of the following: 30 1.âManaging appointment scheduling and reminders. 31 2.âDrafting general communications related to therapy 32 logistics that do not involve therapeutic advice. 33 3.âProcessing billing and insurance claims. 34 4.âPreparing and managing patient records. 35 5.âAnalyzing data for operational purposes. 36 (b)âRecord or transcribe a counseling or therapy session if 37 a licensee obtains written, informed consent at least 24 hours 38 before the provision of services. 39 Section 2.âSection 491.019, Florida Statutes, is created to 40 read: 41 491.019âUse of artificial intelligence.â 42 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âartificial 43 intelligenceâ means any machine-based system that varies in 44 level of autonomy and that, for any explicit or implicit 45 objective, infers from the inputs the system receives how to 46 generate outputs, including, but not limited to, content, 47 decisions, predictions, or recommendations that can influence 48 physical or virtual environments. 49 (2)âExcept as otherwise provided in this section, a 50 licensee, registered intern, or certificateholder may not use 51 artificial intelligence in the practice of clinical social work, 52 marriage and family therapy, or mental health counseling. A 53 licensee, registered intern, or certificateholder may use 54 artificial intelligence to: 55 (a)âAssist in administrative or supplementary support 56 services. Administrative and supplementary support services 57 include, but are not limited to, all of the following: 58 1.âManaging appointment scheduling and reminders. 59 2.âDrafting general communications related to therapy 60 logistics that do not involve therapeutic advice. 61 3.âProcessing billing and insurance claims. 62 4.âPreparing and managing patient records. 63 5.âAnalyzing data for operational purposes. 64 (b)âRecord or transcribe a counseling or therapy session if 65 a licensee, registered intern, or certificateholder obtains 66 written, informed consent at least 24 hours before the provision 67 of services. 68 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.